src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Wangkajunga language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON NounReduplication	! not sure how to do this yet (there is a chapter in B&K on redupl)
		n_agr ;

LEXICON n_agr  
+N: x_agr ; ! This is the "General noun stem" of the floatchart

! Ergativity: Abs IV, Erg [ TV Abs ]

LEXICON x_agr ! This is the "General noun stem" of the floatchart
derivational_case_1 ;
semantic_case_1 ;
grammatical_case_1 ;
derivational_avoid_case ;
end_noun_cases ; ! leads to overgeneration - but many unanalysed forms in "gold-standard" texts.
! TODO: add flag diacritic for INCH as to verb conjugation. add a-insert in twolc after consonants.
+V+Inch:%>arri 	verb_tense_inflections ; ! inchoative. Maybe +Inch+V is more intuitive?
@U.CONJ.WA@+V+Act:@U.CONJ.WA@%>ti	verb_tense_inflections;

LEXICON derivational_case_1
! leading to derivational_case_2
@U.DCASE.HAV@+Der/Hav:@U.DCASE.HAV@%>kurlu		derivational_case_2 ; ! having
@U.DCASE.THING@+Der/Thing:@U.DCASE.THING@%>pinti	derivational_case_2 ; ! associated thing
@U.DCASE.PRIV@+Der/Priv:@U.DCASE.PRIV@%>parni		derivational_case_2 ; ! privative
@U.DCASE.INT@+Der/Int:@U.DCASE.INT@%>kija		derivational_case_2 ; ! intentive
@U.DCASE.WANT@+Der/Want:@U.DCASE.WANT@%>jiraja		derivational_case_2 ; ! want
@U.DCASE.ASST@+Der/Asst:@U.DCASE.ASST@%>jarra		derivational_case_2 ; ! associated time or space
@U.DCASE.TEMP@+Der/Temp:@U.DCASE.TEMP@%>puru		derivational_case_2 ; ! temporal
@U.DCASE.DWELL@+Der/Dwell:@U.DCASE.DWELL@%>karraja	derivational_case_2 ; ! dweller
@U.DCASE.SIDE@+Der/Side:@U.DCASE.SIDE@%>karti		derivational_case_2 ; ! side
@U.DCASE.TYPE@+Der/Type:@U.DCASE.TYPE@%>partu		derivational_case_2 ; ! type
@U.DCASE.SIM@+Der/Sim:@U.DCASE.SIM@%>yuru		derivational_case_2 ; ! similar
@U.DCASE.CONTR@+Der/Contr:@U.DCASE.CONTR@%>munu		derivational_case_2 ; ! contradictive
@U.DCASE.MOD@+Der/Mod:@U.DCASE.MOD@%>marta		derivational_case_2 ; ! moderative
@U.DCASE.BIG@+Der/Big:@U.DCASE.BIG@%>paka		derivational_case_2 ; ! very big
@U.DCASE.ANOTH@+Der/Anoth:@U.DCASE.ANOTH@%>kujupa	derivational_case_2 ; ! another
@U.DCASE.VERY@+Der/Very:@U.DCASE.VERY@%>minyirri	derivational_case_2 ; ! very
@U.DCASE.NUM@+Der/Num:@U.DCASE.NUM@%>marlu		derivational_case_2 ; ! numerative
@U.DCASE.DUAL@+Der/Dual:@U.DCASE.DUAL@%>kujarra		derivational_case_2 ; ! dual
@U.DCASE.FEW@+Der/Few:@U.DCASE.FEW@%>paraku		derivational_case_2 ; ! few
@U.DCASE.PL@+Der/Pl:@U.DCASE.PL@%>n			derivational_case_2 ; ! plural alternative 1
@U.DCASE.PL@+Der/Pl:@U.DCASE.PL@%>rti			derivational_case_2 ; ! plural alternative 2
@U.DCASE.GRP@+Der/Grp:@U.DCASE.GRP@%>ngurun		derivational_case_2 ; ! group *afterwards comes PA
@U.DCASE.PAIR@+Der/Pair:@U.DCASE.PAIR@%>rarra		derivational_case_2 ; ! pair
@U.DCASE.ONLY@+Der/Only:@U.DCASE.ONLY@%>wiyaju		derivational_case_2 ; ! only
@U.DCASE.FOC@+Der/Foc:@U.DCASE.FOC@%>nguninji derivational_case_2 ; ! focus (sometimes annotated as SPEC)
! leading to semantic_case_2
				semantic_case_2 ;	
+Der/Hav:%>kurlu		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Thing:%>pinti		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Priv:%>parni		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Int:%>kija			semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Want:%>jiraja		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Asst:%>jarra		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Temp:%>puru		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Dwell:%>karraja		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Side:%>karti		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Type:%>partu		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Sim:%>yuru			semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Contr:%>munu		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Mod:%>marta		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Big:%>paka			semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Anoth:%>kujupa		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Very:%>minyirri		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Num:%>marlu		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Dual:%>kujarra		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Few:%>paraku		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Pl:%>n			semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Pl:%>rti			semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Grp:%>ngurun		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Pair:%>rarra		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Only:%>wiyaju		semantic_case_2 ;
+Der/Foc:%>nguninji		semantic_case_2 ;

LEXICON semantic_case_1
+Abl:%>janu		derivational_case_3 ;	! Ablative (motion away from a place)
+Abl:%>nguru		derivational_case_3 ;
+Gen:%>kurnu		derivational_case_3 ;	! Genitive (referred to as POSS - possessive - in book)
! +Gen:%>kura		derivational_case_3 ;	! kurnu is by far the most common GEN form
! +Gen:%>kurangu	derivational_case_3 ;
+Loc:%>ngka		derivational_case_3 ;	! Locative - following a vowel (better done in twolc)
! +Loc:%>ja		derivational_case_3 ;	! following a consonant (native words or foreign words)
! +Loc:%>ta		derivational_case_3 ;	! following a consonant (alternative for foreign words)
+Perl:%>wana		derivational_case_3 ;	! Perlative (motion along / across a place)
+All:%>kutu		derivational_case_3 ;	! Allative (motion towards a place)

LEXICON grammatical_case_1
	derivational_focus_case ;
+Abs: 	derivational_focus_case ;
+Erg:%>lu derivational_focus_case; ! will do different ergative forms in twolc
! +Erg:%>ju derivational_focus_case; ! twolc
! +Erg:%>tu derivational_focus_case; XXX must get a separate contlex from Foreign words in -C.
+Dat:%>ku derivational_focus_case;

LEXICON derivational_avoid_case
+Avoid:%>ngkamarra	# ;	! Avoid (following a vowel) (will do in twolc)
! +Avoid:%>jamarra	# ;	! Avoid (following a consonant)

LEXICON derivational_case_2
@D.DCASE.HAV@+Der/Hav:@D.DCASE.HAV@%>kurlu		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.THING@+Der/Thing:@D.DCASE.THING@%>pinti	grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.PRIV@+Der/Priv:@D.DCASE.PRIV@%>parni		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.INT@+Der/Int:@D.DCASE.INT@%>kija		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.WANT@+Der/Want:@D.DCASE.WANT@%>jiraja		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.ASST@+Der/Asst:@D.DCASE.ASST@%>jarra		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.TEMP@+Der/Temp:@D.DCASE.TEMP@%>puru		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.DWELL@+Der/Dwell:@D.DCASE.DWELL@%>karraja	grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.SIDE@+Der/Side:@D.DCASE.SIDE@%>karti		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.TYPE@+Der/Type:@D.DCASE.TYPE@%>partu		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.SIM@+Der/Sim:@D.DCASE.SIM@%>yuru		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.CONTR@+Der/Contr:@D.DCASE.CONTR@%>munu		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.MOD@+Der/Mod:@D.DCASE.MOD@%>marta		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.BIG@+Der/Big:@D.DCASE.BIG@%>paka		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.ANOTH@+Der/Anoth:@D.DCASE.ANOTH@%>kujupa	grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.VERY@+Der/Very:@D.DCASE.VERY@%>minyirri	grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.NUM@+Der/Num:@D.DCASE.NUM@%>marlu		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.DUAL@+Der/Dual:@D.DCASE.DUAL@%>kujarra		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.FEW@+Der/Few:@D.DCASE.FEW@%>paraku		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.PL@+Der/Pl:@D.DCASE.PL@%>n			grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.PL@+Der/Pl:@D.DCASE.PL@%>rti			grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.GRP@+Der/Grp:@D.DCASE.GRP@%>ngurun		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.PAIR@+Der/Pair:@D.DCASE.PAIR@%>rarra		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.ONLY@+Der/Only:@D.DCASE.ONLY@%>wiyaju		grammatical_case_3 ;
@D.DCASE.FOC@+Der/Foc:@D.DCASE.FOC@%>nguninji		grammatical_case_3 ;

LEXICON semantic_case_2
! leading to grammatical_case_3
			grammatical_case_3 ;
+Abl:%>janu		grammatical_case_3 ;
+Abl:%>nguru		grammatical_case_3 ;
+Gen:%>kurnu		grammatical_case_3 ;
! +Gen:%>kura		grammatical_case_3 ;
! +Gen:%>kurangu	grammatical_case_3 ;
+Loc:%>ngka		grammatical_case_3 ;
! +Loc:%>ja		grammatical_case_3 ;
! +Loc:%>ta		grammatical_case_3 ;
+Perl:%>wana		grammatical_case_3 ;
+All:%>kutu		grammatical_case_3 ;
! leading to semantic_case_3
@U.SCASE.ABL@+Abl:@U.SCASE.ABL@%>janu		semantic_case_3 ;
@U.SCASE.ABL@+Abl:@U.SCASE.ABL@%>nguru		semantic_case_3 ;
@U.SCASE.GEN@+Gen:@U.SCASE.GEN@%>kurnu		semantic_case_3 ; ! kurnu is by far the most common form
! @U.SCASE.GEN@+Gen:@U.SCASE.GEN@%>kura		semantic_case_3 ;
! @U.SCASE.GEN@+Gen:@U.SCASE.GEN@%>kurangu	semantic_case_3 ;
@U.SCASE.LOC@+Loc:@U.SCASE.LOC@%>ngka		semantic_case_3 ;
! @U.SCASE.LOC@+Loc:@U.SCASE.LOC@%>ja		semantic_case_3 ;
! @U.SCASE.LOC@+Loc:@U.SCASE.LOC@%>ta		semantic_case_3 ;
@U.SCASE.PERL@+Perl:@U.SCASE.PERL@%>wana	semantic_case_3 ;
@U.SCASE.ALL@+All:@U.SCASE.ALL@%>kutu		semantic_case_3 ;
